Louisiana, session 2026, HB77.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:783(F)(13) and (14) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§783. Expenses of clerk's office
* * *
F.
* * *
(13) The clerk of court of Lincoln Parish shall pay from the clerk's salary
fund one hundred percent of the premium costs of the group life and accidental death
and dismemberment, group health, accident, dental, hospital, surgical, or other
medical expense insurance for any clerk or employee who was a covered employee,
who elects to continue coverage, and who retires from the office of the Lincoln
Parish Clerk of Court and begins receiving monthly benefits from the Louisiana
Clerks' of Court Retirement and Relief Fund immediately upon retirement from
active employment with at least twenty years of full-time service with the office of
the Lincoln Parish Clerk of Court, and who is at least fifty-five years of age. The
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 77 ENROLLED
provisions of this Paragraph do not apply to any other insurance, such as
supplemental insurance, that an employee may elect to purchase.
(14) The clerk of court of Lafourche Parish shall pay from the clerk's salary
fund one hundred percent of the premium costs of the group life and accidental death
and dismemberment, group health, accident, dental, hospital, surgical, or other
medical expense insurance for any clerk or employee who was a covered employee,
who elects to continue coverage, and who retires from the office of the Lafourche
Parish Clerk of Court and begins receiving monthly benefits from the Louisiana
Clerks' of Court Retirement and Relief Fund immediately upon retirement from
active employment with at least twenty years of full-time service with the office of
the Lafourche Parish Clerk of Court, and who is at least fifty-five years of age. The
provisions of this Paragraph do not apply to any other insurance, such as
supplemental insurance, that an employee may elect to purchase.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.